Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2609
Major life activity, defined.

Major life activity means a function such as caring for oneself, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning, and working.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 9.